src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON n_11_E2I        !!= @CODE@ on ovi:ove, joki:joke, hyksi, suomi ! Ei lainasanat
+N+Dial/Por    :^Por         x_11_E2I  ;
+N+Dial/Var    :^Var         x_11_E2I  ;
+N+Dial/Jok    :^Jok         x_11_E2I  ;
+N+Sg          :^E2I         nom_R           ; ! ^EI e to i
!+N+Dial/Var:^¤   x_11_E2I ; TODO for joen VAR, needs to not break other stuff

LEXICON x_11_E2I
  +Sg+Nom      :^E2I         K               ; ! ^EI e to i
  +Sg          :^WG          gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por :             par_V           ; ! suomee
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^E2I         par_A           ; ! suomea
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^E2I         par_A           ; ! suomea
  +Sg          :^HMETA       ill_hVVn        ; ! tyvheen
  +Sg          :             ess_nA          ;
  +Sg          :^WG          sgpl_cases_even ; !! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl          :^WG          nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por :%>i2         gen_Vn          ; ! hyksiin
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>i2      gen_tten        ; ! hyksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>i2      gen_tten        ; ! hyksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por :%>i2         par_V           ; ! hyksii
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2         par_A           ; ! hyksiä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2         par_A           ; ! hyksiä
  +Pl          :^EDEL        ill_hiin        ; ! TODO add Twolc description about EDEL ! suomhiin
  +Pl          :%>i2         ess_nA          ;
  +Pl          :%>i2         com_ne          ;
  +Pl          :^WG%>i2      sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl
  !      +Pl+Ill:^EDEL%>hii n_PxK         ; ! TODO add Twolc description about EDEL ! suomhiin

LEXICON x_11_E2I_prop !propernouns

  +Sg+Nom      :^E2I         K               ; 
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG       gen_n_sg        ; !Lemmijoven
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG       gen_n_sg        ; !Lemmijoen
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG       gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:              par_V           ; 
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^E2I          par_A           ; 
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^E2I          par_A           ; 
  +Sg          :^HMETA       ill_hVVn        ; 
  +Sg          :             ess_nA          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG       sgpl_cases_even ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG       sgpl_cases_even ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG       sgpl_cases_even ;

  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG       nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG       nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG       nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2          gen_Vn          ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>i2       gen_tten        ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>i2       gen_tten        ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2          par_V           ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2          par_A           ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2          par_A           ; 
  +Pl          :^EDEL        ill_hiin        ; 
  +Pl          :%>i2         ess_nA          ;
  +Pl          :%>i2         com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG%>i2   sgpl_cases_even ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG%>i2   sgpl_cases_even ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG%>i2   sgpl_cases_even ;


LEXICON n_11_pl        !!= * @CODE@  "villahousut", lyhyt vokali, yks vartalo, kasvot
+N             :       x_11_pl    ;
+N+Pl          :       nom_t      ; ! housut, kasvot

LEXICON x_11_pl        !!= * @CODE@ ! Seems like no adjectives call this?


  +Pl+Dial/Por :%>i2               gen_n           ; ! kasvoin
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2               gen_tten        ; ! kasvoitten, housuitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2               gen_tten        ; ! kasvoitten, housuitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por :%>i2               par_end         ; ! kasvoi
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>j                par_A           ; ! kasvoja
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>j                par_A           ; ! kasvoja
  +Pl          :^HMETA             ill_hVin        ;
  +Pl          :%>i2               ess_nA          ;
  +Pl          :%>i2               com_ne          ;
  +Pl          :%>i2               sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl

  ! LEXICON vanha_kk-longgenpl
  !      +Gen:%>kk%>i2           #               ; ! kk ?? Tsekkaa..

  !LEXICON vanha_kk-longgparpl
  ! +Par:%>kk%>i2 # ; ! kk ?? Tsekkaa..

LEXICON n_21        !!= * @CODE@  opettaaja, karamelli
n_21_sg ;
n_21_pl ;

LEXICON n_21_sg
+N         :    x_21  ;
+N+Sg      :    nom_R    ;

LEXICON n_21_pl
+N: x_21_pl ;

LEXICON x_21 ! adjektiivit ynnä muut
x_21_sg ;
x_21_pl ;

LEXICON x_21_sg
  +Sg      :         nom_end                  ;
  +Sg      :^WG      gen_n_sg           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:         par_V              ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:         par_A              ; ! karamellia
  +Sg+Dial/Var:         par_A              ; ! karamellia
  +Sg      :^HMETA   ill_hVVn           ;
  +Sg      :         ess_nA              ; ! karamellina
  +Sg      :^WG      sgpl_cases_even    ; ! the same affix in sg and pl

LEXICON x_21_pl
  +Pl      :^WG      nom_t              ; ! liberaalit
  +Dial/Por:         x_21_pl_por        ;
  +Dial/Jok:         x_21_pl_var        ;
  +Dial/Var:         x_21_pl_var        ;

        !   +Pl:^WG%>i2       gen_tten           ;
        !   +Pl:%>i2          par_tA             ;
        !   +Pl:%>i2          par_end            ; !liberaali, dialissa on liberaalia?
        !   +Pl:%>i2          ess_nA                ;
        !   +Pl:%>i2          com_ne             ;

LEXICON x_21_pl_por
  +Pl      :^WG%>i2    gen_tten    ;
  +Pl      :%>i2       par_tA      ;
  +Pl      :%>i2       par_end     ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA     ill_hiin    ;
  +Pl      :%>i2       ess_nA      ;
  +Pl      :%>i2       com_ne      ;
  +Pl      :^WG%>i2  sgpl_cases_even    ; ! Adding  to block i:0
  
  !  +Pl+Dial/Por :^A0%>i2%>i      par_end        ; ! %> i necessary, otherwise a:o NOTwork, kajavii


LEXICON x_21_pl_var ! TODO look at Dummy symbol structure in Twolc, now that we
                          ! need more of them. Rules for when (which problems) and
                          ! where (in the string/word "structure") ! ^WG before ^A2I always?
  +Pl      :^WG^A2I   gen_tten    ;
  +Pl      :^A2I      par_A       ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA    ill_hiin    ;
  +Pl      :^A2I      ess_nA      ; ! karamelline
  +Pl      :^A2I      com_ne      ; ! karamellina
  +Pl      :^WG^A2I    sgpl_cases_even    ; ! Adding  to block i:0 karamellitten

! +Pl:%>i2        gen_n              ; opettaajiin
! +Pl+Tra:%>i2ksi K ; Lene removed this one
! !+Pl+Tra:%>i2kse     PxxK               ;

LEXICON n_21_ae_even
+N: x_21_ae_even ;

LEXICON x_21_ae_even 
  +Sg      :         nom_end                  ;
  +Sg      :^WG      gen_n_sg           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:         par_V              ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:         par_A              ; ! karamellia
  +Sg+Dial/Var:         par_A              ; ! karamellia
  +Sg      :^HMETA   ill_hVVn           ;
  +Sg      :         ess_nA              ; ! karamellina
  +Sg      :^WG      sgpl_cases_even    ;
  +Pl      :^WG          nom_t          ;
  +Pl      :^WG%>i2    gen_tten    ;
  +Pl      :%>i2i       par_tA      ;
  +Pl      :%>i2%>i       par_end     ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA     ill_hiin    ;
  +Pl      :%>i2       ess_nA      ;
  +Pl      :%>i2       com_ne      ;
  +Pl      :^WG%>i2  sgpl_cases_even    ; ! Adding  to block i:0

LEXICON n_21_odd !!= * @CODE@  kajava
+N         :  x_21_odd ;

LEXICON x_21_odd !!= * @CODE@  kajava
x_21_odd_nomsg ;
x_21_odd_oblique ;

LEXICON x_21_odd_nomsg
  +Sg          :             nom_end              ;
