src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
opinto-ohjaaja:opinto-#ohjaaja n_21_odd ;
ajjaaja:ajjaaja n_21_odd ;
hakkaaja:hakkaaja n_21_odd ;
mahlaaja:mahlaaja n_21_odd ;
lainaaja:lainaaja n_21_odd ;
saarnaaja:saarnaaja n_21_odd ;
mahatanssaaja:maha#tanssaaja n_21_odd ;
hihtaaja:hihtaaja n_21_odd ;
työnjohtaaja:työn#johtaaja n_21_odd ;
matkustaaja:matkustaaja n_21 ;
sanansaattaaja:sanan#saattaaja n_21_odd ;
ilmoittaaja:ilmoittaaja n_21 ;
urunsoittaaja:urun#soittaaja n_21_odd ;
anttaaja:anttaaja n_21_odd ;
osanottaaja:osan#ottaaja n_21_odd ;
juustonjuoksuttaaja:juuston#juoksuttaaja n_21_odd ;
pihlaja:pihlaja n_21_odd ;
apaja:apaja n_21_odd ;
viljat:vilja n_11_pl ;
maanviljooja:maan#viljooja n_21_odd ;
haukkuuja:haukkuuja n_21_odd ;
ruottukka:ruottukka n_21 ;
engelska n_21_odd ;
kaljama:kaljama n_21_odd ;
satama:satama n_21_odd ;
halkkeema:halkkeema n_21_odd ;
kuđelma:kuđelma n_21_odd ;
mammona:mammona n_21_odd ;
pataljuuna:pataljuuna n_21 ;
kapusta:kapusta n_21_odd  ;
palava:palava n_21_odd ;
jehuva:jehuva n_21_odd ;
ketunrauđat:ketun#rauđa n_11_pl ;
klinkkuveitti:klinkku#veitt2e n_11_E2I ;
taittheet:taitthee n_11_pl ;
matonkutheet:maton#kuthee n_11_pl ;
riihi:riihe n_11_E2I ;
tuohi:tuohe n_11_E2I ;
isoveli:iso#velje n_11_E2I ;
veli:velje n_11_E2I ;
reki:reke n_11_E2I ;
solki:solke n_11_E2I ;
kylki:kylke n_11_E2I ;
jälki:jälke n_11_E2I ;
henki:henke n_11_E2I ;
onki:onke n_11_E2I ;
valtajoki:valta#joke n_11_E2I ;
noki:noke n_11_E2I ;
kurki:kurke n_11_E2I ;
leski:leske n_11_E2I ;
sääski:sääske n_11_E2I ;
käki:käke n_11_E2I ;
sotaväki:sota#väke n_11_E2I ;
herrasväki:herras#väke n_11_E2I ;
saame:saame n_11_E2I ;
sukunimi:suku#nime n_11_E2I ;
pittääjännimi:pittääjä#nime n_11_E2I ; 
helmi:helme n_11_E2I ;
paskasuomi:paska#suome n_11_E2I ;
pikkusormi:pikku#sorme n_11_E2I ;
onni:onne n_11_E2I ;
appi:appe n_11_E2I ;
sakset:sakse n_11_pl ;
kiharahykset:kihara#hykse n_11_pl ;
lahti:lahte n_11_E2I ;
iltatähti:ilta#tähte n_11_E2I ;
tähti:tähte n_11_E2I ;
hiilikivi:hiili#kive n_11_E2I ;
kattokivi:katto#kive n_11_E2I ;
keskitalvi:keski#talve n_11_E2I ;
ruffelipilvi:ruffeli#pilve n_11_E2I ;
sukupolvi:suku#polve n_11_E2I ;
lovi:love n_11_E2I ;
parvi:parve n_11_E2I ;
torvi:torve n_11_E2I ;
järvi:järve n_11_E2I ;
suvi:suve n_11_E2I ;
maanpruukit:maan#pruuk2i n_11_pl ;
pyramidi:pyramidi n_21 ;
mokkakaffi:mokka#kaffi n_21 ;
psykoloogi:psykoloogi n_21 ;
maateriäijit:maateri#äiji n_11_pl ;
brakit:braki n_11_pl ;
bolševiikki:bolševiikki n_21 ;
fiskupolitikki:fisku#politikki n_21 ;
juomingit:juominki n_21_pl ;
sortteerinki:sortteerinki n_21 ;
ullivesijoki:ulli#vesi#joki n_11_E2I ;
ordinaali:ordinaali n_21 ;
keneraali:keneraali n_21 ;
kapitteli:kapitteli n_21 ;
alkohooli:alkohooli n_21 ;
nationalismi:nationalismi n_21 ;
narkomaani:narkomaani n_21 ;
kvanttoripronomeni:kvanttori#pronomeni n_21 ;
parafiini:parafiini n_21 ;
metesiini:metesiini n_21 ;
engelsmanni:engelsmanni n_21 ;
kramafooni:kramafooni n_21 ;
mikrofooni+Err/Orth:mikrofuuni n_21 ; 
postposisuuni:postposisuuni n_21 ;
kuvadokumentašuuni:kuva#dokumentašuuni n_21 ;
agenttikonstruksjuuni:agentti#konstruksjuuni n_21 ; 
koipi:koipe n_11_E2I ;
korpi:korpe n_11_E2I ;
singulaari:singulaari n_21 ;
paarit:paari n_11_pl ;
fepruaari:fepruaari n_21 ;
novemperi:novemperi n_21 ;
orkesteri:orkesteri n_21 ;
teatteri:teatteri n_21 ;
siitosorit:siitos#ori n_11_pl ;
eeventyyri:eeventyyri n_21 ;
miljonääri:miljonääri n_21 ;
arranšööri:arranšööri n_21 ;
overalsit:overalsi n_11_pl ;
kongruensi:kongruensi n_21 ;
akvedukti:akvedukti n_21 ;
jäähyvästit:jäähyvästi n_11_pl ;
publisiteetti:publisiteetti n_21 ;
presidentti:presidentti n_21 ;
institutti:institutti n_21 ;
illatiivi:illatiivi n_21 ;
substantiivi:substantiivi n_21 ;
rauhankirkonmenot:rauhan#kirkon#meno n_11_pl ;
aivot:aivo n_11_pl ;
kasvot:kasvo n_11_pl ;
piđot:piđo n_11_pl ;
prakut:praku n_11_pl ;
suunittelu:suunittelu n_21 ;
lastenvaunut:lasten#vaunu n_11_pl ;
rullatraput:rulla#trapu n_11_pl ;
ruvanloput:ruvan#lopu n_11_pl ;
villahousut:villa#housu n_11_pl ;
uimahousut:uima#housu n_11_pl ;
palonkihousut:palonki#housu n_11_pl ;
dongerihousut:dongeri#housu n_11_pl ;
alushousut:alus#housu n_11_pl ;
housut:housu n_11_pl ;
vantut:vantu n_11_pl ;
villavanthuut:villa#vanthuu n_11_pl ;
isokäräjä:iso#käräjä n_21_odd ;
äänestäjä:äänestäjä n_21_ae_even ;
mähättäjä:mähättäjä n_21_ae_even ;
pötäjä:pötäjä n_21_odd ;
lapsenpäästääjä:lapsen#päästääjä n_21_odd ;
käänttääjä:käänttääjä n_21_odd ;
etelä:etelä n_21_odd ;
pitenemä:pitenemä n_21_ae_even ;
vieremä:vieremä n_21_odd ;
näkymä:näkymä n_21_odd ;
elämä:elämä n_21_odd ;
reppenä:reppenä n_21_odd ;
jyppyrä:jyppyrä n_21_odd ;
hämärä:hämärä n_21_odd ;
vyötärä:vyötärä n_21_odd ;
kevät:kevä n_11_pl ;
syntymäpäivät:syntymäpäivä n_11_pl ;
ystävä:ystävä n_21_odd ;
käsikärröt:käsi#kärrö n_11_pl ;
